Washington statutes.
RCW 36.150.070

Continuation of rules, regulations, and pending business—Performance of contracts—Validity of official acts.

(1) All rules and regulations, and all pending business before the board of any county ferry district transferred pursuant to this chapter[,] must be continued and acted upon by the county.

(2) All existing contracts and obligations of the transferred county ferry district remain in full force and effect , and must be performed by the county. A transfer authorized in this chapter does not affect the validity of any official act performed by any official or employee prior to the transfer authorized pursuant to this chapter.

[ 2014 c 51 s 7.]